Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5998.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 25 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 12F the following section:-
Section 12F½. (a) The transportation division shall establish a grant program to be known
as the Massachusetts school bus safety technology grant program to facilitate efficient and
effective implementation and installation of school bus sensors pursuant to clause (19) of the first
paragraph of section 7B of chapter 90 by school districts, as defined in section 2 of chapter 70.
(b) The grant program established in subsection (a) shall allow school districts to apply
for funding to: (i) fit school buses operated by a school district, whether owned or leased, with
sensors to determine the presence of objects in the front or in the back of the school bus required
pursuant to clause (19) of the first paragraph of section 7B of chapter 90; or (ii) offset additional
of 3

costs charged by a contractor for school bus transportation resulting from safety equipment
upgrades required by said clause (19) of said first paragraph of said section 7B.
(c) Subject to appropriation, the transportation division shall allocate funding necessary
to support the implementation and evaluation of the grant program.
(d) The transportation division shall prepare an annual report that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) an evaluation of the grant program’s effectiveness in the installation of school bus
sensors; (ii) analysis of the applicants that apply for grants pursuant to subsection (b); and (iii)
any recommendations for improving or the expansion of the installation of school bus sensors in
the commonwealth. The annual report shall be submitted, not later than December 31 of each
year of the program, to the chairs of the joint committee on transportation, the chairs of the joint
committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy and the clerks of the house of
representatives and senate.
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of section 7B of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “year” in
line 137, the second time it appears, the following words:- ; (19) Each school bus shall be
equipped with a sensor to determine the presence of objects in the front or in the back of the
school bus. The design and installation of the sensors shall comply with the rules and regulations
promulgated by the department of public utilities transportation oversight division established in
section 12F of chapter 25.
SECTION 3. Regulations promulgated by the department of public utilities transportation
oversight division pursuant to clause (19) of the first paragraph of section 7B of chapter 90 of the
General Laws shall be promulgated within 180 days of the effective date of this act.
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 2 of this act shall not take effect until 360 days after regulations are
promulgated pursuant to section 3.
SECTION 5. This act shall be known and may be cited as “Lens’ Law”, named after Lens
Arthur Joseph.
of 3